Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB395.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8114 of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 8114. Emergency medical responders.* * *(b.1) National certification reciprocity.--(1) The department shall provide a provisional certification as an EMR to an individual who possesses a valid and current certification from the National Registry of Emergency Medical Technicians as an emergency medical responder, a certified first responder, an emergency medical technician, an advanced emergency medical technician or a paramedic.(2) A provisional certification issued under paragraph 123456789101112131415161718 (1) shall be valid for three years and converted to a standard certification under subsection (b) upon completion of the triennial registration process under subsection (c).(3) A candidate who is seeking provisional certification under this subsection and meets the requirements under paragraph (1) shall be issued a provisional certification on an expedited basis in accordance with this subsection.(4) For the purposes of this subsection, the term "provisional certification" means an EMR certification that is currently valid and the status of which is subject to change at a later date.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0395PN0360 - 2 - 12345678910111213